New York, session 2025-2026, S1760.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 3641-c 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3641-c. Grants for laundry equipment or facilities. The commissioner 4 shall establish a program of competitively awarded grants within the 5 amount appropriated for such purpose, to public K-12 schools, as defined 6 by the commissioner, which are eligible for support provided under Title 7 I of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, for the 8 purposes of installing laundry equipment for facilities for use by 9 students and parents or guardians of students. When awarding such 10 grants, preference shall be given to schools with significant percent- 11 ages of students who reside in emergency housing and/or who experience 12 frequent absenteeism due to a lack of clean clothing. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 14 the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02305-01-5